Idaho statutes. Title 25 ANIMALS
Chapter 32
RENDERING ESTABLISHMENTS

Sec.

§ 25-3201. Definitions.

When used in this act:

The term “rendering establishment” means a place of business that deals in rendering material of animal origin and processes it into finished products in such a way that risk, damage, or nuisance to animal or public health is avoided. Any person who receives from any other person the body of any dead animal for the purposes of obtaining the hide, skin, grease, meat, bones, or parts thereof from such animal for further processing to a finished form as described in paragraph (5) of this section is deemed to be engaged in the business of disposing and rendering of the bodies of dead animals or parts thereof.

The term “rendering material” means and includes any dead animal not slaughtered as food for animals or man, or if slaughtered for food, becomes unsuitable for such use, and includes all parts of dead animals and all inedible by-products of animals slaughtered or processed as food.

The term “animal” means any member of the animal kingdom such as fish, reptiles, birds and mammals, etc.

The term “4-D animals” means dead, dying, disabled, or diseased animals.

The term “finished products” means any product or material processed or manufactured from rendering material or from 4-D animals by a rendering establishment or establishment processing 4-D animals such as bone meal, blood meal, meat meal, tankage, feather meal, tallow, etc., or fresh frozen, partially cooked, or cooked or canned pet, fur animal, or other animal feed.

The term “establishments processing 4-D animals” means a place of business that processes the carcasses or any part of carcasses of 4-D animals to be used as feed for dogs, cats, fur-bearing or other animals.

The term “inspector” means a state employee trained and assigned to inspect rendering plants and establishments processing 4-D animals.

The term “department” means the state department of agriculture.

The term “laboratory tests” means tests conducted as deemed necessary by the department to ensure that the finished product meets required specifications for quality and safety (to include protein analysis, contaminating agents of disease, etc.); such laboratory tests to be performed in laboratories approved as provided in paragraph (8) of this section and on samples of finished products collected by the inspector.

History.

1969, ch. 33, § 1, p. 57; am. 2014, ch. 97, § 6, p. 265.

§ 25-3202. License requirement.

No person shall engage in the business of collecting, disposing, or rendering of the bodies of dead animals or parts thereof without first obtaining a license for such purpose from the department. Application for license shall be made on forms provided by the department and shall be accompanied by a fee of $25.00. On receipt of such application, the department shall inspect the premises in which the applicant proposes to conduct such business. No license shall be issued unless the department finds that the premises comply with the requirements thereof. If the department finds that the applicant’s premises do not comply with the requirements of this section or with the rules of the department, it shall notify the applicant wherein the same fails to so comply. If within a reasonable time to be fixed by the department, but not more than 90 days thereafter, the specified defects are remedied, the department shall make a second inspection and proceed therewith as in the case of an original inspection.

History.

1969, ch. 33, § 2, p. 57.

§ 25-3203. Establishing standards for establishments prior to application for license.

The license referred to in section 25-3202, Idaho Code, shall be issued to an establishment only if the following requirements are met:

A fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the issuance of a license shall be paid to the state by the licensee, subject to renewal each year.

All rendering establishments and establishments processing 4-D animals are to be constructed in such a manner as to protect the finished product and to prevent pollution of surrounding environment or creation of a nuisance to the public.

All rendering material shall be transported to the rendering establishment in covered and leak-proof vehicles, such vehicles to be used for this purpose only and to be cleaned and disinfected after delivering each load.

All rendering material shall be heated to a sufficient temperature for a sufficient length of time to destroy all pathogens and processed under sanitary procedures that prohibit the recontamination of the product after cooking.

The finished product shall be transported from the rendering establishment or the establishment processing 4-D animals in a clean vehicle in such a manner that will prevent contamination.

Rendering establishments and establishments processing 4-D animals may be inspected periodically by an inspector who may procure samples for laboratory testing.

History.

1969, ch. 33, § 3, p. 57; am. 2014, ch. 97, § 7, p. 265.

§ 25-3204. Revocation of licenses.

A license may be revoked if requested by the operator of a licensed establishment or if in the opinion of the licensing authority, the establishment fails to meet the sanitation or bacteriological standards required to effectuate the purposes of this act.

History.

1969, ch. 33, § 4, p. 57.

§ 25-3205. Prohibiting unfinished products from intrastate shipment.

Only finished products from licensed rendering establishments or licensed establishments processing 4-D animals will be allowed to move intrastate.

History.

1969, ch. 33, § 5, p. 57.

§ 25-3206. Enforcement of regulations.

The department is hereby authorized and empowered to promulgate and enforce such regulations as it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this act.

History.

1969, ch. 33, § 6, p. 57.

§ 25-3207. Restraining order authorized.

The director of the department of agriculture is hereby authorized to issue orders to restrain the operation of any rendering or disposal plant or establishment engaged in the collection of, handling of, or transportation of rendering materials or finished products where such operation is carried on in violation of the laws of the state of Idaho or the rules, regulations or orders made thereunder. Restraining orders will be issued after notice and hearing, except that restraining orders may be issued without notice of hearing where in the opinion of the director the violation constitutes a menace to public health requiring immediate and summary abatement and he so finds in writing. Licensees shall have the right to appeal from restraining orders to the appropriate district court within twenty (20) days after service of the restraining order whether such order be made upon hearing or summarily. Execution of a restraining order may be stayed on appeal except when such restraining order is issued to restrain a menace to public health requiring immediate and summary abatement.

History.

1969, ch. 33, § 7, p. 57; am. 1974, ch. 18, § 172, p. 364.

§ 25-3208. Exemptions.

Animal rendering and processing facilities within establishments licensed under Idaho or federal meat inspection laws shall be exempt from the licensing provisions of this act but shall otherwise comply with it.

History.

1969, ch. 33, § 8, p. 57.